Maryland, session 2026, HB1077.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) In this section, “post–CCR pathway” means the post college and career
pathways established under § 7–205.1 of the Education Article.
(b) The State Department of Education and the Career and Technical Education
Committee jointly shall convene a workgroup to review the State’s high school curriculum,
high school graduation requirements, and the post–CCR pathways established under the
Blueprint for Maryland’s Future to study and make recommendations on developing a
tiered system of stackable credential pathways that allow students to earn portable,
industry–recognized certificates that build toward higher–level postsecondary education
credentials and degrees.
(c) The workgroup shall:
(1) review and analyze models or frameworks for stackable credential
models used in secondary schools in other states, including:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1077*

HOUSE BILL 1077
(i) the three–tiered stackable credential framework model of the
South Carolina Department of Education, including the career readiness curriculum,
assessments, and credentialing components; and
(ii) the Success–Ready Pathways model and “Career–Ready” high
school diploma designations of the Arkansas Department of Education;
(2) consider the feasibility of implementing:
(i) an individual student graduation plan using an aptitude–based
tool, beginning in the 8th grade, reviewed each year by a school counselor for alignment
with the student’s post–CCR pathway;
(ii) a flexible credit system in which specific courses in a student’s
chosen post–CCR pathway may be substituted for required courses or credits; and
(iii) a work–based learning capstone that may substitute for a
student’s senior year English or mathematics elective course;
(3) examine effective methods for ensuring the portability of stacked
credentials across regions of the State and institutions of postsecondary education;
(4) consider development of a uniform credentials of value list that is
jointly managed by the State Department of Education, the Maryland Department of
Labor, and the Career and Technical Education Committee that:
(i) allows for the addition of industry–recognized credentials on
both a rolling and quarterly basis by any of the list managers for maximum flexibility;
(ii) includes any credential aligned with a State–registered
apprenticeship; and
(iii) includes an expedited review process for credentials in
high–demand fields; and
(5) review and analyze stackable credential models that are designed to
allow maximum flexibility, including:
(i) stacking micro–credentials to be equivalent to a recognized
credential of value;
(ii) allowing credits from one pathway to be transferrable to another
pathway to ensure continuation of progress towards graduation; and
(iii) a 1:3 credit rule that requires one industry–recognized credential
to equal a minimum of three credits in a corresponding degree program at an institution of

HOUSE BILL 1077 3
higher education in the State based on mandatory articulation agreements with community
colleges.
(d) The workgroup shall review the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future Interim
Evaluation report submitted to the Accountability and Implementation Board by December
1, 2026, to determine whether existing Blueprint career and technology education
requirements are designed and being implemented in a manner that is aligned with the
tiered system of stackable credential pathways studied by the workgroup under this
section.
(e) On or before December 31, 2026, the State Department of Education and the
Career and Technical Education Committee shall submit a report on the findings and
recommendations of the workgroup, including the need for any statutory or regulatory
changes, to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article,
the Senate Education, Energy, and the Environment Committee and the House Ways and
Means Committee.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.